prince/dictionaries/ca.aff
SFX A   çava   ces         çava             #    caces
SFX A   gava   gues        gava             #    porgues 
SFX A   java   ges         java             #    venges
SFX A   ava    i           [^cçgjieou]ava   # 3. canti
SFX A   ava    ï           [^aeiou][eio]ava #    suï
SFX A   iava   ï           [aeiou]iava      #    desmaï
SFX A   guava  güi         guava            #    enaigüi
SFX A   quava  qüi         quava            #    adeqüi
SFX A   uava   uï          [^gq]uava        #    evacuï
SFX A   cava   qui         cava             #    cerqui
SFX A   çava   ci          çava             #    caci
SFX A   gava   gui         gava             #    porgui
SFX A   java   gi          java             #    vengi
SFX A   ava    e           [^cçgju]ava      #    cante
SFX A   ava    e           [^gq]uava        #    sue
SFX A   guava  güe         guava            #    enaigüe
SFX A   quava  qüe         quava            #    adeqüe
SFX A   cava   que         cava             #    cerque 
SFX A   çava   ce          çava             #    cace 
SFX A   gava   gue         gava             #    porgue 
SFX A   java   ge          java             #    venge 
SFX A   ava    em          [^cçgju]ava      # 4. cantem
SFX A   ava    em          [^gq]uava        #    suem
SFX A   guava  güem        guava            #    enaigüem
SFX A   quava  qüem        quava            #    adeqüem
SFX A   cava   quem        cava             #    cerquem
SFX A   çava   cem         çava             #    cacem
SFX A   gava   guem        gava             #    porguem
SFX A   java   gem         java             #    vengem
SFX A   ava    eu          [^cçgju]ava      # 5. canteu
SFX A   ava    eu          [^gq]uava        #    sueu
SFX A   guava  güeu        guava            #    enaigüeu
SFX A   quava  qüeu        quava            #    adeqüeu
SFX A   cava   queu        cava             #    cerqueu
SFX A   çava   ceu         çava             #    caceu
SFX A   gava   gueu        gava             #    porgueu
SFX A   java   geu         java             #    vengeu
SFX A   ava    in          [^cçgjieou]ava   # 6. cantin
SFX A   ava    ïn          [^aeiou][eio]ava #    canviïn, suïn
SFX A   iava   ïn          [aeiou]iava      #    desmaïn
SFX A   ava    ïn          [gq]uiava        #    esquiïn
SFX A   iava   ïn          [^gq]uiava       #
SFX A   guava  güin        guava            #    enaigüin
SFX A   quava  qüin        quava            #    adeqüin
SFX A   uava   uïn         [^gq]uava        #    evacuïn
SFX A   cava   quin        cava             #    cerquin
SFX A   çava   cin         çava             #    cacin
SFX A   gava   guin        gava             #    porguin
SFX A   java   gin         java             #    vengin
SFX A   ava    en          [^cçgju]ava      #    cante
SFX A   ava    en          [^gq]uava        #    sue
SFX A   guava  güen        guava            #    enaigüen
SFX A   quava  qüen        quava            #    adeqüen
SFX A   cava   quen        cava             #    cerquen
SFX A   çava   cen         çava             #    cacen
SFX A   gava   guen        gava             #    porguen 
SFX A   java   gen         java             #    vengen
SFX A   ava    és          [^cçgju]ava      # 1. cantés - subjuntiu imperfet <SIM>
SFX A   ava    és          [^gq]uava        #    sués
SFX A   guava  güés        guava            #    enaigüés
SFX A   quava  qüés        quava            #    adeqüés
SFX A   cava   qués        cava             #    cerqués
SFX A   çava   cés         çava             #    cacés
SFX A   gava   gués        gava             #    porgués
SFX A   java   gés         java             #    vengés
SFX A   ava    às          ava              #    cantàs
SFX A   ava    ara         ava              #    cantara
SFX A   ava    essis       [^cçgju]ava      # 2. cantessis
SFX A   ava    esses       [^cçgju]ava      #    cantesses
SFX A   ava    assis       ava              #    cantassis
SFX A   ava    ares        ava              #    cantares
SFX A   ava    essis       [^gq]uava        #    suessis
SFX A   ava    esses       [^gq]uava        #    suesses
SFX A   guava  güessis     guava            #    enaigüessis
SFX A   quava  qüessis     quava            #    adeqüessis
SFX A   guava  güesses     guava            #    enaigüesses
SFX A   quava  qüesses     quava            #    adeqüesses
SFX A   cava   quessis     cava             #    cerquessis
SFX A   cava   quesses     cava             #    cerquesses
SFX A   çava   cessis      çava             #    cacessis
SFX A   çava   cesses      çava             #    cacesses
SFX A   gava   guessis     gava             #    porguessis
SFX A   gava   guesses     gava             #    porguesses
SFX A   java   gessis      java             #    vengessis
SFX A   java   gesses      java             #    vengesses
SFX A   ava    és          [^cçgju]ava      # 3. cantés - subjuntiu imperfet <SIM>
SFX A   ava    és          [^gq]uava        #    sués
SFX A   guava  güés        guava            #    enaigüés
SFX A   quava  qüés        quava            #    adeqüés
SFX A   cava   qués        cava             #    cerqués
SFX A   çava   cés         çava             #    cacés
SFX A   gava   gués        gava             #    porgués
SFX A   java   gés         java             #    vengés
SFX A   ava    às          ava              #    cantàs
SFX A   ava    ara         ava              #    cantara
SFX A   ava    éssim       [^cçgju]ava      # 4. cantéssim
SFX A   ava    éssem       [^cçgju]ava      #    cantéssem
SFX A   ava    àssim       ava              #    cantàssim
SFX A   ava    àrem        ava              #    cantàrem
SFX A   ava    éssim       [^gq]uava        #    suéssim
SFX A   ava    éssem       [^gq]uava        #    suéssem
SFX A   guava  güéssim     guava            #    enaigüéssim
SFX A   quava  qüéssim     quava            #    adeqüéssim
SFX A   guava  güéssem     guava            #    enaigüéssem
SFX A   quava  qüéssem     quava            #    adeqüéssem
SFX A   cava   quéssim     cava             #    cerquéssim
SFX A   cava   quéssem     cava             #    cerquéssem
SFX A   çava   céssim      çava             #    cacéssim
SFX A   çava   céssem      çava             #    cacéssem
SFX A   gava   guéssim     gava             #    porguéssim
SFX A   gava   guéssem     gava             #    porguéssem
SFX A   java   géssim      java             #    vengéssim
SFX A   java   géssem      java             #    vengéssem
SFX A   ava    éssiu       [^cçgju]ava      # 5. cantéssiu
SFX A   ava    ésseu       [^cçgju]ava      #    cantésseu
SFX A   ava    àssiu       ava              #    cantàssiu
SFX A   ava    àreu        ava              #    cantàreu
SFX A   ava    éssiu       [^gq]uava        #    suéssiu
SFX A   ava    ésseu       [^gq]uava        #    suésseu
SFX A   guava  güéssiu     guava            #    enaigüéssiu
SFX A   quava  qüéssiu     quava            #    adeqüéssiu
SFX A   guava  güésseu     guava            #    enaigüésseu
SFX A   quava  qüésseu     quava            #    adeqüésseu
SFX A   cava   quéssiu     cava             #    cerquéssiu
SFX A   cava   quésseu     cava             #    cerquésseu
SFX A   çava   céssiu      çava             #    cacéssiu
SFX A   çava   césseu      çava             #    cacésseu
SFX A   gava   guéssiu     gava             #    porguéssiu
SFX A   gava   guésseu     gava             #    porguésseu
SFX A   java   géssiu      java             #    vengéssiu
SFX A   java   gésseu      java             #    vengésseu
SFX A   ava    essin       [^cçgju]ava      # 6. cantessin
SFX A   ava    essen       [^cçgju]ava      #    cantessen
SFX A   ava    assin       ava              #    cantassin
SFX A   ava    aren        ava              #    cantaren
SFX A   ava    essin       [^gq]uava        #    suessin
SFX A   ava    essen       [^gq]uava        #    suessen
SFX A   guava  güessin     guava            #    enaigüessin
